Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5341SV (2) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2423 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 144H.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âAble to consentâ means a patient is willing and able 4 to communicate a decision independently or with appropriate 5 services, technological assistance, support decision making, or 6 other reasonable accommodation and is able to understand the 7 nature and consequences of the decision, including the primary 8 risks and benefits of a decision. 9 2. âAuthorized representativeâ means any of the following: 10 a. An agent as that term is defined in section 633B.102. 11 b. An attorney in fact as that term is defined in section 12 144B.1. 13 c. A conservator as that term is defined in section 14 633B.102. 15 d. A guardian as that term is defined in section 633B.102. 16 e. A public guardian as that term is defined in chapter 17 231E. 18 3. âCare facilityâ means a facility that provides a patient 19 with health-related and personal care services, including any 20 of the following: 21 a. A hospital. 22 b. A medical clinic. 23 c. A nursing facility. 24 d. A rehabilitation facility as that term is defined in 25 section 135C.1. 26 e. A residential care facility as that term is defined in 27 section 135C.1. 28 4. âDepartmentâ means the department of health and human 29 services. 30 5. âPatientâ means an adult who is receiving health-related 31 or personal care services from a care facility. 32 6. âPerson authorized to consentâ means a member of any of 33 the following groups of individuals, in order of priority, who 34 is willing and able to consent, refuse to consent, or withdraw 35 -1- LSB 5341SV (2) 91 ak/ko 1/ 11 S.F. 2423 consent on a patientâs behalf: 1 a. The patientâs spouse. 2 b. An adult child of the patient or, if the patient has more 3 than one adult child, the decision agreed to by half or more of 4 the adult children reasonably available for consultation with 5 the patientâs physician. 6 c. A parent or parents of a patient, if one or both parents 7 are reasonably available for consultation with the patientâs 8 physician. 9 d. An adult sibling of the patient or, if the patient has 10 more than one adult sibling, the decision agreed to by half or 11 more of the adult siblings who are reasonably available for 12 consultation with the patientâs physician. 13 7. âPlacementâ means the admission, discharge, or transfer 14 of a patient. 15 8. âPublic assistance programâ means a state or federally 16 funded program including but not limited to: 17 a. The Medicaid program as that term is defined in section 18 249A.2. 19 b. Medicare pursuant to the federal government health 20 insurance program established under Tit. XVIII of the Social 21 Security Act. 22 c. A medical benefits package pursuant to 38 C.F.R. Â§17.38. 23 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 144H.2 Inability to consent ââ 24 certification. 25 Upon examination of a patient, a physician licensed under 26 chapter 148 may certify in the patientâs medical records 27 that in the professional opinion of the physician all of the 28 following are true: 29 1. The patient is not able to consent. 30 2. Despite good-faith efforts, an authorized representative 31 for the patient has not been located by the physician. 32 3. It is in the patientâs best interests to be discharged 33 from the patientâs current care facility and to be transferred 34 or admitted to a care facility recommended by the physician. 35 -2- LSB 5341SV (2) 91 ak/ko 2/ 11 S.F. 2423 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 144H.3 Person authorized to consent ââ 1 powers and duties. 2 1. Upon a physicianâs certification pursuant to section 3 144H.2, a person authorized to consent is authorized to do any 4 of the following: 5 a. Make decisions regarding the patientâs care facility 6 placement. 7 b. Assist the patient in applying for health insurance 8 coverage through a private insurer, or applying for a public 9 assistance program, as necessary to facilitate the patientâs 10 care facility placement. 11 c. Take any other action expressly authorized by the 12 patient. 13 2. A person authorized to consent shall act in good faith 14 and must consider all of the following: 15 a. The patientâs wishes, if known. 16 b. The patientâs rights. 17 c. The best interests of the patient. 18 3. A person authorized to consent may, as reasonably 19 necessary to assist the patient in applying for health 20 insurance coverage through a private insurer, or applying for a 21 public assistance program, do any of the following: 22 a. Access the patientâs banking and other financial records 23 as permitted by state and federal law. This paragraph shall 24 not be construed to permit the person authorized to consent to 25 own, manage, use, or dispose of any of the patientâs financial 26 resources without the patientâs express consent. 27 b. Disclose the patientâs relevant health information to 28 a third party. The person authorized to consent shall not 29 disclose a patientâs protected health information in violation 30 of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability 31 Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191. 32 4. The authority of a person authorized to consent shall 33 expire upon the earliest of any of the following: 34 a. The date that the patientâs care facility placement 35 -3- LSB 5341SV (2) 91 ak/ko 3/ 11 S.F. 2423 as decided by the person authorized to consent is completed, 1 and notice of approval or denial of an application for health 2 insurance coverage through a private insurer, or for a public 3 assistance program, if applicable, is received by a qualified 4 employee of the receiving care facility. 5 b. An authorized representative, or a person authorized to 6 consent who has higher priority, has been located. 7 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 144H.4 Care facility ââ duties. 8 1. A social worker, discharge planner, or other qualified 9 employee as designated by a patientâs current care facility 10 shall do all of the following with respect to a person 11 authorized to consent: 12 a. Inform the person of the personâs powers and duties 13 pursuant to this chapter. 14 b. Assist the person with identifying a receiving care 15 facility for the patient that can provide the least restrictive 16 and appropriate level of care, as recommended by the physician 17 under section 144H.2, for the patient and consented to by a 18 social worker, intake coordinator, or other qualified employee 19 of the receiving care facility. 20 2. If a receiving care facility for the patient that can 21 provide the least restrictive and appropriate level of care as 22 described under subsection 1 is identified, and the receiving 23 care facility consents, the patient shall be transferred to the 24 receiving care facility. 25 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 144H.5 Petition for court order. 26 1. After good-faith efforts to locate an authorized 27 representative for the patient or a person authorized to 28 consent, a care facility or attending physician may petition a 29 court of competent jurisdiction to order any of the following: 30 a. The patientâs care facility placement. 31 b. The patientâs attending physician or a social worker, 32 intake worker, or other qualified employee of the receiving 33 care facility to assist the patient to apply for health 34 insurance coverage through a private insurer or apply for a 35 -4- LSB 5341SV (2) 91 ak/ko 4/ 11 S.F. 2423 public assistance program, if appropriate. 1 2. The petition made must include the following 2 information: 3 a. The name, age, and address where the patient resides, if 4 known to the petitioner. 5 b. The name, address, and county of residence of the 6 petitioner. 7 c. The relationship of the petitioner to the patient. 8 d. The address where the patient can be found, if different 9 from the patientâs residential address. 10 e. A physicianâs certification pursuant to section 144H.2. 11 f. An affidavit from the patientâs attending physician, 12 that upon an examination of the patient and consultation with 13 another health care provider, all of the following are true: 14 (1) The patient is not able to consent. 15 (2) The patient has not identified, and despite good-faith 16 efforts the attending physician has been unable to locate, an 17 authorized representative or a person authorized to consent. 18 (3) The receiving care facility placement recommended by 19 the attending physician is in the patientâs best interests. 20 (4) The receiving care facility placement recommended by 21 the attending physician will provide the least restrictive and 22 most appropriate level of care for the patient, and is within a 23 reasonable proximity to the patientâs residence, if applicable. 24 g. An affidavit from a social worker, discharge planner, or 25 other qualified employee as designated by the patientâs current 26 care facility attesting to all of the following: 27 (1) The patient has not identified, and despite good-faith 28 efforts the current care facility has been unable to locate, an 29 authorized representative or a person authorized to consent. 30 (2) The receiving care facility placement recommended by 31 the attending physician will provide the least restrictive and 32 most appropriate level of care for the patient. 33 (3) Other care facilities within a reasonable proximity 34 to the patientâs residence were considered for placement, if 35 -5- LSB 5341SV (2) 91 ak/ko 5/ 11 S.F. 2423 applicable. 1 h. An affidavit from a social worker, intake coordinator, 2 or other qualified employee of the receiving care facility 3 recommended by the patientâs attending physician attesting to 4 all of the following: 5 (1) The receiving care facility is the most appropriate 6 facility available for the patient. 7 (2) The receiving care facility can provide the least 8 restrictive and most appropriate level of care to the patient. 9 (3) The receiving care facility consents to the transfer or 10 admission of the patient. 11 i. The name and address of the receiving care facility 12 recommended by the attending physician. 13 3. The court may grant the petition if the court finds all 14 of the following: 15 a. The patient is not able to consent. 16 b. Despite good-faith efforts by the attending physician 17 and the patientâs current care facility, an authorized 18 representative or person authorized to consent has not been 19 located. 20 c. Placement in the receiving care facility recommended 21 by the patientâs attending physician is in the patientâs best 22 interest. 23 d. Placement in the receiving care facility recommended 24 by the patientâs attending physician will provide the least 25 restrictive and most appropriate level of care for the patient. 26 e. A social worker, intake coordinator, or other qualified 27 employee of the receiving care facility recommended by the 28 patientâs attending physician has consented to the admission 29 of the patient. 30 4. If the court grants the petition under subsection 3, the 31 court shall also order, if necessary, that a qualified employee 32 of the receiving care facility has the authority to apply for a 33 public assistance program on the patientâs behalf. 34 5. An order authorizing placement pursuant to this section 35 -6- LSB 5341SV (2) 91 ak/ko 6/ 11 S.F. 2423 shall remain in effect until the earliest of any of the 1 following: 2 a. A date specified by the court not to exceed thirty 3 calendar days from the date of issuance of the order. 4 b. The date the patientâs placement in the receiving care 5 facility as ordered by the court is completed. 6 c. The date an attending physician certifies that the 7 patient is able to consent to the patientâs placement in the 8 receiving care facility. 9 6. An order authorizing a qualified employee of a receiving 10 facility to apply for a public assistance program on a 11 patientâs behalf pursuant to this section shall remain in 12 effect until the earliest of any of the following: 13 a. A date specified by the court. 14 b. Notice of approval or denial of an application for health 15 insurance coverage through a private insurer, or for a public 16 assistance program is received by a qualified employee of the 17 receiving facility. 18 c. The date that an attending physician certifies that the 19 patient is able to consent to the application for a public 20 assistance program. 21 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 144H.6 Immunity ââ liability and 22 professional discipline. 23 1. A person or care facility acting in good faith pursuant 24 to this chapter shall not be subject to civil or criminal 25 liability. 26 2. A licensee under chapter 148 acting reasonably and in 27 good faith pursuant to this chapter shall not be subject to 28 licensee discipline. 29 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 144H.7 Construction. 30 This chapter shall not be construed to do any of the 31 following: 32 1. Require a care facility to accept the transfer or 33 admission of a patient. 34 2. Repeal, abrogate, or impair the operation of any other 35 -7- LSB 5341SV (2) 91 ak/ko 7/ 11 S.F. 2423 federal or state laws governing the transfer, admission, or 1 discharge of a patient to or from a care facility. 2 3. Infringe upon the rights of a patient under federal or 3 state law relating to the involuntary transfer, admission, or 4 discharge to or from a care facility. 5 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 144H.8 Rules. 6 The department may promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 17A 7 as necessary to administer this chapter. 8